District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.84

Full faith and credit of United States not pledged.

The full faith and credit of the United States is not pledged for the payment of any principal of or interest on any bond, note, or other obligation issued by the District under this part. The United States is not responsible or liable for the payment of any principal of or interest on any bond, note, or other obligation issued by the District under this part.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 484
as added Dec. 23, 1981, 95 Stat. 1499, Pub. L. 97-105, § 15
1981 Ed., § 47-331.3.
“This part,” referred to in this section, refers to part E (comprising §§ 461 to 490) of title IV of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, approved December 24, 1973, 88 Stat. 804-809, Pub. L. 93-198, codified as §§ 1-204.89, 1-204.88, 1-204.87, and 1-204.61 to 1-204.90.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Act 8-246, the “Tax Revenue Anticipation Notes Act of 1990.”, see Mayor’s Order 90-118, September 27, 1990.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 9-46, the “General Fund Recovery Act of 1991.”, see Mayor’s Order 91-147, October 4, 1991.